Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF800.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; EQUASPACE.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Equaspace to provide work space and wrap-around services to small and start-up nonprofit organizations. Money may be used for work space, IT support, human resource assistance, accounting, fundraising, and executive director support. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end